West Virginia, session 2026, SB870.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-2. State minimum salaries for teachers. (a) For school year 2024-2025, and continuing thereafter, each teacher shall receive the amount prescribed in the State Minimum Salary Schedule as set forth in this section, specific additional amounts prescribed in this section or article, and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code during the contract year.STATE MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE Years Exp4th Class3rd Class2nd ClassA.B.A.B. 15M.A.M.A. 15M.A. 30M.A.45Doctorate 039,05739,74640,01241,45542,21643,98344,74445,50546,26647,301 139,38540,07440,34041,97342,73444,50245,26346,02346,78447,819 239,71440,40240,66842,49243,25345,02045,78146,54247,30348,338 340,04240,73040,99643,01143,77145,53946,30047,06047,82148,856 440,61441,30241,56843,77344,53446,30247,06347,82348,58449,619 540,94241,63041,89644,29245,05346,82047,58148,34249,10350,138 641,27041,95842,22444,81045,57147,33948,10048,86049,62150,656 741,59842,28742,55245,32946,09047,85748,61849,37950,14051,175 841,92642,61542,88145,84746,60848,37649,13749,89750,65851,693 942,25442,94343,20946,36647,12748,89449,65550,41651,17752,212 1042,58343,27143,53746,88647,64649,41450,17550,93651,69652,731 1142,91143,59943,86547,40448,16549,93350,69351,45452,21553,250 1243,23943,92744,19347,92348,68350,45151,21251,97352,73353,768 1343,56744,25544,52148,44149,20250,97051,73052,49153,25254,287 1443,89544,58344,84948,96049,72051,48852,24953,01053,77054,805 1544,22344,91145,17749,47850,23952,00752,76753,52854,28955,324 1644,55145,23945,50549,99750,75752,52553,28654,04754,80755,842 1744,87945,56845,83350,51551,27653,04453,80554,56555,32656,361 1845,20745,89646,16251,03451,79553,56254,32355,08455,84556,880 1945,53546,22446,49051,55252,31354,08154,84255,60256,36357,398 2045,86346,55246,81852,07152,83254,59955,36056,12156,88257,917 2146,19246,88047,14652,58953,35055,11855,87956,63957,40058,435 2246,52047,20847,47453,10853,86955,63656,39757,15857,91958,954 2346,84847,53647,80253,62754,38756,15556,91657,67658,43759,472 2447,17647,86448,13054,14554,90656,67457,43458,19558,95659,991 2547,50448,19248,45854,66455,42457,19257,95358,71459,47460,509 2647,83248,52048,78655,18255,94357,71158,47159,23259,99361,028 2748,16048,84849,11455,70156,46158,22958,99059,75160,51161,546 2848,48849,17749,44256,21956,98058,74859,50860,26961,03062,065 2948,81649,50549,77156,73857,49859,26660,02760,78861,54862,583 3049,14449,83350,09957,25658,01759,78560,54561,30662,06763,102 3149,47350,16150,42757,77558,53660,30361,06461,82562,58563,620 3249,80150,48950,75558,29359,05460,82261,58362,34363,10464,139 3350,12950,81751,08358,81259,57361,34062,10162,86263,62364,658 3450,45751,14551,41159,33060,09161,85962,62063,38064,14165,176 3550,78551,47351,73959,84960,61062,37763,13863,89964,66065,695 (b) Six hundred dollars shall be paid annually to each classroom teacher who has at least 20 years of teaching experience. The payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers.(c) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher providing math instruction in the teacher’s certified area of study for at least 60 percent of the time the teacher is providing instruction to students shall be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection  (a) of this section: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(d) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher certified in special education and employed as a full-time special education teacher, as defined by the State Superintendent, shall be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection (a) of this section: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(e) In accordance with §18A-4-5 of this code, each teacher shall be paid the supplement amount as applicable for his or her classification of certification or classification of training and years of experience as follows, subject to the provisions of that section: (1) For "4th Class" at zero years of experience, $1,781. An additional $38 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(2) For "3rd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,796. An additional $67 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(3) For "2nd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,877. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(4) For "A.B." at zero years of experience, $2,360. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(5) For "A.B. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,452. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(6) For "M.A." at zero years of experience, $2,644. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(7) For "M.A. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,740. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(8) For "M.A. + 30" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(9) For "M.A. + 45" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience; and(10) For "Doctorate" at zero years of experience, $2,927. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience.These payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule, any specific additional amounts prescribed in this section and article and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers.(f) Beginning school year 2026-2027 and continuing thereafter for the ensuing four school years, the amounts prescribed in the State Minimum Salary Schedule set forth in this section shall be increased by $2,000 each year, such that the state minimum salary for all teachers will, by the 2030-2031 school year, have increased by $10,000 over the minimum salary levels set in the 2025-2026 school year. §18A-4-8a. Service personnel minimum monthly salaries. (a) Effective July 1, 2024, the minimum monthly pay for each service employee shall be as follows:(1) For school year 2024-2025 and continuing thereafter, the minimum monthly pay for each service employee whose employment is for a period of more than three and one-half hours a day shall be at least the amounts indicated in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade Schedule set forth in this subdivision and the minimum monthly pay for each service employee whose employment is for a period of three and one-half hours or less a day shall be at least one-half the amount indicated in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade Schedule set forth in this subdivision. STATE MINIMUM PAY SCALE PAY GRADE SCHEDULE YearsPAY GRADE Exp.ABCDEFGH 02,3772,3982,4402,4932,5462,6092,6412,714 12,4092,4312,4722,5252,5792,6422,6732,747 22,4422,4632,5052,5582,6112,6742,7062,779 32,4742,4962,5382,5912,6442,7072,7392,812 42,5072,5292,5702,6232,6762,7402,7712,846 52,5402,5612,6032,6562,7092,7722,8042,878 62,5722,5942,6372,6892,7422,8052,8372,911 72,6062,6262,6692,7212,7742,8382,8692,944 82,6392,6592,7022,7542,8072,8702,9022,976 92,6712,6922,7352,7882,8402,9032,9343,009 102,7042,7252,7672,8202,8722,9372,9683,042 112,7372,7582,8002,8532,9052,9693,0013,074 122,7692,7912,8322,8862,9393,0023,0333,107 132,8022,8232,8652,9182,9713,0343,0663,140 142,8352,8562,8982,9513,0043,0673,0993,172 152,8672,8892,9302,9833,0363,1003,1313,205 162,9002,9212,9633,0163,0693,1323,1643,238 172,9322,9542,9973,0493,1023,1653,1973,271 182,9652,9873,0293,0813,1343,1983,2293,304 192,9993,0193,0623,1143,1673,2303,2623,336 203,0313,0523,0953,1483,2003,2633,2953,370 213,0643,0843,1273,1803,2323,2963,3273,404 223,0973,1183,1603,2133,2653,3293,3613,436 233,1293,1513,1933,2463,2993,3633,3953,470 243,1623,1833,2253,2783,3313,3973,4283,504 253,1953,2163,2583,3113,3653,4293,4623,536 263,2273,2493,2903,3453,3993,4633,4943,570 273,2603,2813,3233,3773,4313,4953,5283,603 283,2933,3143,3573,4113,4653,5293,5623,637 293,3253,3483,3903,4433,4983,5633,5943,671 303,3593,3803,4243,4773,5313,5953,6283,704 313,3923,4143,4583,5113,5653,6293,6623,737 323,4263,4473,4903,5443,5973,6633,6943,771 333,4603,4803,5243,5783,6313,6953,7283,804 343,4923,5143,5583,6123,6653,7293,7623,837 353,5263,5483,5903,6443,6973,7633,7953,871 363,5603,5813,6243,6783,7323,7963,8293,903 373,5923,6153,6583,7123,7663,8303,8623,937 383,6263,6473,6903,7443,7983,8633,8953,971 393,6603,6813,7243,7783,8323,8963,9294,003 403,6923,7153,7573,8113,8663,9303,9624,037 (2) Each service employee shall receive the amount prescribed in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade in accordance with the provisions of this subsection according to their class title and pay grade as set forth in this subdivision: CLASS TITLEPAY GRADE Accountant I D Accountant II E Accountant III F Accounts Payable Supervisor G Aide I A Aide II B Aide III C Aide IV D Aide V – Temporary Authorization E Aide V F Aide VI – Temporary Authorization E Aide VI F Audiovisual Technician C Auditor G Autism Mentor F Braille Specialist E Bus Operator D Buyer F Cabinetmaker G Cafeteria Manager D Carpenter I E Carpenter II F Chief Mechanic G Clerk I B Clerk II C Computer Operator E Cook I A Cook II B Cook III C Crew Leader F Custodian I A Custodian II B Custodian III C Custodian IV D Director or Coordinator of Services H Draftsman D Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher I E Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher II E Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher III F Educational Sign Language Interpreter I F Educational Sign Language Interpreter II G Electrician I F Electrician II G Electronic Technician I F Electronic Technician II G Executive Secretary G Food Services Supervisor G Foreman G General Maintenance C Glazier D Graphic Artist D Groundsman B Handyman B Heating and Air Conditioning Mechanic I E Heating and Air Conditioning Mechanic II G Heavy Equipment Operator E Inventory Supervisor D Key Punch Operator B Licensed Practical Nurse F Locksmith G Lubrication Man C Machinist F Mail Clerk D Maintenance Clerk C Mason G Mechanic F Mechanic Assistant E Office Equipment Repairman I F Office Equipment Repairman II G Painter E Paraprofessional F Payroll Supervisor G Plumber I E Plumber II G Printing Operator B Printing Supervisor D Programmer H Roofing/Sheet Metal Mechanic F Sanitation Plant Operator G School Bus Supervisor E Secretary I D Secretary II E Secretary III F Sign Support Specialist E Supervisor of Maintenance H Supervisor of Transportation H Switchboard Operator-Receptionist D Truck Driver D Warehouse Clerk C Watchman B Welder F WVEIS Data Entry and Administrative Clerk B (b) An additional $12 per month is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person who holds a high school diploma or its equivalent.(c) An additional $11 per month also is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds 12 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(2) A service person who holds 24 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(3) A service person who holds 36 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(4) A service person who holds 48 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(5) A service employee who holds 60 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(6) A service person who holds 72 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(7) A service person who holds 84 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(8) A service person who holds 96 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(9) A service person who holds 108 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(10) A service person who holds 120 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board.(d) An additional $40 per month also is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds an associate’s degree;(2) A service person who holds a bachelor’s degree;(3) A service person who holds a master’s degree;(4) A service person who holds a doctorate degree.(e) An additional $11 per month is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds a bachelor’s degree plus 15 college hours;(2) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 15 college hours;(3) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 30 college hours;(4) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 45 college hours; and(5) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 60 college hours.(f) Each service person is paid a supplement, as set forth in §18A-4-5 of this code, of $164 per month, subject to the provisions of that section. These payments: (i) Are in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade, any specific additional amounts prescribed in this section and article and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5b of this code; (ii) are paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) are considered a part of the state minimum salaries for service personnel.(g) When any part of a school service person’s daily shift of work is performed between the hours of 6:00 p. m. and 5:00 a. m. the following day, the employee is paid no less than an additional $10 per month and one half of the pay is paid with local funds.(h) Any service person required to work on any legal school holiday is paid at a rate one and one-half times the person’s usual hourly rate.(i) Any full-time service personnel required to work in excess of their normal working day during any week which contains a school holiday for which they are paid is paid for the additional hours or fraction of the additional hours at a rate of one and one-half times their usual hourly rate and paid entirely from county board funds.(j) A service person may not have his or her daily work schedule changed during the school year without the employee’s written consent and the person’s required daily work hours may not be changed to prevent the payment of time and one-half wages or the employment of another employee.(k) The minimum hourly rate of pay for extra duty assignments as defined in §18A-4-8b of this code is no less than one seventh of the person’s daily total salary for each hour the person is involved in performing the assignment and paid entirely from local funds: Provided, That an alternative minimum hourly rate of pay for performing extra duty assignments within a particular category of employment may be used if the alternate hourly rate of pay is approved both by the county board and by the affirmative vote of a two-thirds majority of the regular full-time persons within that classification category of employment within that county: Provided, however, That the vote is by secret ballot if requested by a service person within that classification category within that county. The salary for any fraction of an hour the employee is involved in performing the assignment is prorated accordingly. When performing extra duty assignments, persons who are regularly employed on a one-half day salary basis shall receive the same hourly extra duty assignment pay computed as though the person were employed on a full-day salary basis.(l) The minimum pay for any service personnel engaged in the removal of asbestos material or related duties required for asbestos removal is their regular total daily rate of pay and no less than an additional $3 per hour or no less than $5 per hour for service personnel supervising asbestos removal responsibilities for each hour these employees are involved in asbestos-related duties. Related duties required for asbestos removal include, but are not limited to, travel, preparation of the work site, removal of asbestos, decontamination of the work site, placing and removal of equipment and removal of structures from the site. If any member of an asbestos crew is engaged in asbestos-related duties outside of the employee’s regular employment county, the daily rate of pay is no less than the minimum amount as established in the employee’s regular employment county for asbestos removal and an additional $30 per each day the employee is engaged in asbestos removal and related duties. The additional pay for asbestos removal and related duties shall be payable entirely from county funds. Before service personnel may be used in the removal of asbestos material or related duties, they shall have completed a federal Environmental Protection Act-approved training program and be licensed. The employer shall provide all necessary protective equipment and maintain all records required by the Environmental Protection Act.(m) For the purpose of qualifying for additional pay as provided in §18A-5-8 of this code, an aide is considered to be exercising the authority of a supervisory aide and control over pupils if the aide is required to supervise, control, direct, monitor, escort, or render service to a child or children when not under the direct supervision of a certified professional person within the classroom, library, hallway, lunchroom, gymnasium, school building, school grounds, or wherever supervision is required. For purposes of this section, "under the direct supervision of a certified professional person" means that certified professional person is present, with and accompanying the aide.(n) Beginning school year 2026-2027 and continuing thereafter for the ensuing four school years, the amounts prescribed in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade Schedule set forth in this section shall be increased by five percent each year over the minimum pay levels in effect as of the effective date of the amendments made to this section during the regular session of the Legislature, 2026, such that the state minimum monthly pay for all service employees will, by the 2030-2031 school year, have increased by 25% over the minimum pay levels set in the 2025-2026 school year.